en: Bedding
xx: Bedding
cs: Lůžkoviny
da: Sengetøj
de: Bettwäsche
es: Ropa de cama
fr: Literie, Parure de lit
it: Lenzuola e coperte
ja: 寝具
nl: Beddengoed
no: Sengetøy
pl: Artykuły pościelowe
pt: Roupas de cama
ru: Постельные принадлежности
sv: Sängkläder
tr: Yatak Takımları

en: Bed Canopies
xx: Bed Canopies
cs: Nebesa
da: Sengehimler
de: Baldachine & Betthimmel
es: Doseles
fr: Ciels de lit
it: Tende per baldacchino
ja: ベッド用天蓋
nl: Bedhemels
no: Himmelsenger
pl: Baldachimy nad łóżko
pt: Dosséis para camas
ru: Балдахины для кроватей
sv: Sänghimlar
tr: Cibinlikler

en: Bed Sheets
xx: Bed Sheets
cs: Prostěradla
da: Lagener
de: Bettlaken
es: Sábanas
fr: Draps de lit, Draps
it: Lenzuola
ja: シーツ
nl: Bedlakens
no: Laken
pl: Prześcieradła
pt: Lençóis
ru: Простыни
sv: Lakan
tr: Çarşaflar

en: Mattress Toppers
xx: Mattress Toppers
fr: Surmatelas

en: Bedskirts
xx: Bedskirts
cs: Postelové obruby
da: Sengeskørter
de: Bettvolants
es: Cubrecanapés
fr: Cache sommiers
it: Mantovane per letto
ja: ベッドスカート
nl: Bedrokken
no: Sengeskjørt
pl: Falbany do łóżek
pt: Saias de cama
ru: Покрывала
sv: Sängkjolar
tr: Karyola Etekleri

en: Blankets
xx: Blankets
cs: Deky
da: Sengetæpper
de: Decken
es: Mantas
fr: Couvertures, Couette, Édredon
it: Coperte
ja: 毛布・ブランケット
nl: Dekens
no: Pledd
pl: Koce
pt: Cobertores
ru: Одеяла
sv: Filtar
tr: Battaniyeler

en: Duvet Covers
xx: Duvet Covers
cs: Povlečení na peřiny
da: Duntæpper
de: Bettbezüge
es: Fundas de nórdico
fr: Housses de couette
it: Copripiumini
ja: 掛け布団カバー
nl: Hoezen voor donsdekens
no: Dynetrekk
pl: Poszwy
pt: Capas de edredons
ru: Пуховые одеяла
sv: Påslakan
tr: Nevresimler

en: Mattress Protectors
xx: Mattress Protectors
cs: Chrániče na matrace
da: Madrasbeskyttere
de: Matratzenschoner
es: Protectores para colchones
fr: Protèges-matelas, Protège-matelas, Alèse
it: Proteggi materasso
ja: マットレス保護用品
nl: Matrasbeschermers
no: Madrassbeskyttere
pl: Ochraniacze na materace
pt: Protetores de colchão
ru: Наматрасники
sv: Madrasskydd
tr: Yatak Koruyucular

en: Mattress Encasements
xx: Mattress Encasements
cs: Povlaky na matrace
da: Madrasbetræk
de: Matratzenbezüge
es: Fundas para colchones
fr: Housses pour matelas
it: Coprimaterassi
ja: マットレスカバー
nl: Matrashoezen
no: Madrasstrekk
pl: Pokrowce na materace
pt: Capas para colchões
ru: Чехлы для матрасов
sv: Madrassöverdrag
tr: Yatak Kılıfları

en: Mattress Pads
xx: Mattress Pads
cs: Krycí matrace
da: Rullemadrasser
de: Matratzenauflagen
es: Cubrecolchones
fr: Couvre-matelas
it: Sopramaterassi
ja: ベッドパッド
nl: Dekmatrassen
no: Overmadrasser
pl: Maty na materace
pt: Capas acolchoadas para colchões
ru: Толстые наматрасники
sv: Madrassdynor
tr: Alezler

en: Nap Mats
xx: Nap Mats
cs: Tenké matrace
da: Hvilemadrasser
de: Schlafunterlagen
es: Esterillas para siesta
fr: Matelas de sieste
it: Materassini da campeggio
ja: お昼寝マット
nl: Slaapmatten
no: Sovematter
pl: Maty do leżenia
pt: Colchonetes
ru: Коврики для сна
sv: Sovmattor
tr: Uyku Minderleri

en: Pillowcases & Shams
xx: Pillowcases & Shams
cs: Povlečení na polštáře
da: Pudebetræk og pyntebetræk
de: Kissenbezüge
es: Fundas de almohada y de cojines
fr: Taies et protections d'oreiller, Taie d'oreiller
it: Federe e copricuscini
ja: 枕カバー
nl: Kussenhoezen
no: Putetrekk og pyntetrekk
pl: Powłoczki i ozdobne poszewki na poduszki
pt: Fronhas e capas de travesseiros
ru: Наволочки и чехлы для подушек
sv: Örngott och kuddvar
tr: Yastık Kılıfları ve Kırlent Kılıfları

en: Pillows
xx: Pillows
cs: Polštáře
da: Puder
de: Kopfkissen
es: Almohadas
fr: Oreillers, Oreiller, Traversins, Traversin, Polochons, Polochon, Oreiller ergonomique
it: Cuscini
ja: 枕
nl: Kussens
no: Puter
pl: Poduszki
pt: Travesseiros
ru: Подушки
sv: Kuddar
tr: Yastıklar

en: Quilts & Comforters
xx: Quilts & Comforters
cs: Patchworkové a jiné přehozy na lůžka
da: Quilte og sengetæpper
de: Steppdecken & Quilts
es: Colchas y edredones
fr: Dessus-de-lit et couettes
it: Trapunte e piumini
ja: キルト・掛け布団
nl: Dekbedden
no: Tepper og sengetepper
pl: Kołdry
pt: Colchas e mantas
ru: Стёганые и пуховые одеяла
sv: Quiltar och täcken
tr: Örtüler ve Yorganlar

en: Kitchen Linens Sets
xx: Kitchen Linens Sets
cs: Sady kuchyňského textilu
da: Køkkentekstilsæt
de: Küchentuchsets
es: Sets de ropa de cocina
fr: Ensembles de linge de cuisine
it: Set di biancheria da cucina
ja: キッチンリネンセット
nl: Keukentextiel
no: Lintøysett til kjøkkenet
pl: Tekstylia kuchenne
pt: Conjuntos de roupas para cozinha
ru: Наборы кухонного белья
sv: Set med kökstextilier
tr: Mutfak Bezi Setleri

en: Table Linens
xx: Table Linens
cs: Stolní prádlo
da: Dækketøj
de: Tischwäsche
es: Mantelería
fr: Linge de table
it: Teli per la tavola
ja: テーブルリネン
nl: Tafellinnen
no: Dekketøy
pl: Bielizna stołowa
pt: Roupas de mesa
ru: Столовое бельё
sv: Bordslinne
tr: Keten Masa Örtüleri

en: Cloth Napkins
xx: Cloth Napkins
cs: Látkové kapesníky
da: Stofservietter
de: Stoffservietten
es: Servilletas de tela
fr: Serviettes en tissu, Serviette en tissu
it: Fazzoletti in tessuto
ja: ナプキン
nl: Stoffen servetten
no: Tøyservietter
pl: Serwetki
pt: Guardanapos de pano
ru: Тканевые салфетки
sv: Tygservetter
tr: Kumaş Peçeteler

en: Doilies
xx: Doilies
cs: Háčkované ubrousky
da: Mellemlægsservietter
de: Zierdecken
es: Tapetes de ganchillo
fr: Napperons
it: Centrini
ja: ドイリー
nl: Onderleggers
no: Brikker
pl: Serwety
pt: Guardanapos decorativos
ru: Салфетки
sv: Tallriksunderlägg och tabletter
tr: Dantel Parçaları

en: Placemats
xx: Placemats
cs: Prostírání
da: Dækkeservietter
de: Tischsets
es: Manteles individuales
fr: Sets de table, Set de table
it: Tovagliette
ja: ランチョンマット
nl: Placemats
no: Dekkeservietter
pl: Maty stołowe
pt: Jogo americano de mesa
ru: Сервировочные салфетки
sv: Bordstabletter
tr: Amerikan Servisler

en: Table Runners
xx: Table Runners
cs: Běhouny na stůl
da: Bordløbere
de: Tischläufer
es: Tapetes
fr: Chemins de table, Chemin de table
it: Guide da tavolo
ja: テーブルランナー
nl: Tafellopers
no: Bordløpere
pl: Bieżniki
pt: Caminhos de mesa
ru: Узкие скатерти для середины стола
sv: Bordslöpare
tr: Masa Runnerları